sl-SI: Tema ozadja: Abstraktno; Živali; Arhitektura; Umetnost in ilustracija; Avtomobili; Igre; Prazniki; Minimalizem; Filmi in TV; Narava; Sezonsko; Vesolje; Šport; Tehnologija; Drugo
ro-RO: Temă wallpaper: Abstract; Animale; Arhitectură; Artă și ilustrare; Mașini; Jocuri; Sărbători; Minimalist; Filme și televiziune; Natură; Sezonier; Spațiu; Sport; Tehnologie; Altele
zh-CN: 壁纸主题: 抽象; 动物风格; 建筑; 艺术与插画; 汽车; 游戏; 节假日; 极简主义; 电影和电视; 自然; 季节; 空间; 体育; 科技; 其他
da: Tapettema: Abstrakt; Dyr; Arkitektur; Kunst & illustration; Biler; Spil; Jul; Minimalistisk; Film & TV; Natur; Sæson; Rummet; Sport; Teknologi; Andet
en: Wallpaper theme: Abstract; Animals; Architecture; Art & illustration; Cars; Games; Holidays; Minimalist; Movies & TV; Nature; Seasonal; Space; Sports; Technology; Other
vi: Chủ đề hình nền: Trừu tượng; Động vật; Kiến trúc; Nghệ thuật & minh họa; Ô tô; Trò chơi; Ngày lễ; Tối giản; Phim & Truyền hình; Thiên nhiên; Theo mùa; Không gian; Thể thao; Công nghệ; Khác
el: Θέμα ταπετσαρίας: Αφηρημένο; Ζώα; Αρχιτεκτονική; Τέχνη & εικονογράφηση; Αυτοκίνητα; Παιχνίδια; Διακοπές; Μινιμαλιστικός; Ταινίες και τηλεόραση; Φύση; Εποχής; Διάστημα; Αθλητισμός; Τεχνολογία; Άλλο
hr-HR: Tema pozadinske slike: Apstraktni; Životinje; Arhitektura; Umjetnost i ilustracija; Automobili; Igre; Praznici; Minimalistički; Filmovi i TV; Priroda; Sezonski; Svemir; Sport; Tehnologija; Ostalo
nl: Behangthema: Abstract; Dieren; Architectuur; Kunst en illustratie; Auto's; Games; Feestdagen; Minimalistisch; Films en tv; Natuur; Seizoenen; Ruimte; Sporten; Technologie; Andere
zh-TW: 壁紙佈景主題: 抽象; 動物; 建築; 藝術與插畫; 車子; 遊戲; 假期; 簡約; 電影與電視節目; 大自然; 季節; 外太空; 體育; 科技; 其他
ja: 壁紙テーマ: 抽象的; 動物; 建築物; アート&イラスト; 車; ゲーム; 休日; ミニマリスト; 映画&テレビ; 自然; 季節; 宇宙; スポーツ; テクノロジー; その他
nb: Bakgrunnstema: Abstrakt; Dyr; Arkitektur; Kunst og illustrasjon; Biler; Spill; Helligdager; Minimalistisk; Filmer og TV; Natur; Sesongbestemt; Verdensrom; Sport; Teknologi; Annen
sv: Bakgrundstema: Abstrakt; Djur; Arkitektur; Konst & illustration; Bilar; Spel; Högtider; Minimalistisk; Filmer och TV; Natur; Säsong; Rymden; Sporter; Teknologi; Annat
cs: Motiv tapety: Abstraktní; Zvířata; Architektura; Umění a ilustrace; Automobily; Hry; Svátky; Minimalistický; Filmy a TV; Příroda; Sezónní; Vesmír; Sporty; Technologie; Jiné
pl: Motyw tapety: Abstrakt; Zwierzęta; Architektura; Sztuka i ilustracja; Samochody; Gry; Wakacje; Minimalistyczny; Filmy i telewizja; Natura; Sezonowy; Powierzchnia; Sport; Technologia; Pozostałe
fi: Taustakuvan teema: Abstrakti; Eläimet; Arkkitehtuuri; Taide ja kuvitus; Autot; Pelit; Lomailu; Minimalistinen; Elokuvat ja TV; Luonto; Kausiluonteinen; Avaruus; Urheilu; Teknologia; Muu
bg-BG: Тема за тапет: Абстрактна; Животни; Архитектура; Изкуство и илюстрация; Автомобили; Игри; Празници; Минималистична; Филми и телевизия; Природа; Сезонна; Космос; Спорт; Технология; Други
sk-SK: Motív tapety: Abstraktný; Zvieratá; Architektúra; Umenie a ilustrácie; Autá; Hry; Prázdniny; Minimalistický; Filmy a televízia; Príroda; Sezóny; Vesmír; Šport; Technológie; Iné
pt-PT: Tema do papel de parede: Abstrato; Animais; Arquitetura; Arte e ilustração; Carros; Jogos; Festividades; Minimalista; Filmes e TV; Natureza; Sazonal; Espaço; Desportivo; Tecnologia; Outro
th: ธีมวอลเปเปอร์: นามธรรม; สัตว์ต่างๆ; สถาปัตยกรรม; ศิลปะและภาพประกอบ; รถยนต์ต่างๆ; เกม; ช่วงวันหยุด; มินิมอล; ภาพยนตร์และทีวี; ธรรมชาติ; ฤดูกาล; อวกาศ; กีฬาต่างๆ; เทคโนโลยี; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tema do papel de parede: Abstrato; Animais; Arquitetura; Arte e ilustração; Carros; Jogos; Feriados; Minimalista; Filmes e TV; Natureza; Sazonal; Espaço; Esportes; Tecnologia; Outro
it: Tema sfondo: Astratto; Animali; Architettura; Arte e illustrazione; Automobili; Giochi; Vacanze; Minimalista; Film e TV; Natura; Stagionale; Spazio; Sport; Tecnologia; Altro
fr: Thème du fond d’écran: Abstrait; Animaux; Architecture; Arts et illustrations; Voitures; Jeux; Vacances; Minimaliste; Films et télévision; Nature; Saisonnier; Espace; Sports; Technologie; Autre
ko: 배경 화면 테마: 추상; 동물; 건축; 예술 & 일러스트레이션; 자동차; 게임; 연휴; 미니멀리스트; 영화 & TV; 자연; 계절; 우주; 스포츠; 기술; 기타
hu: Háttérkép témája: Absztrakt; Állatok; Építészet; Művészet és illusztráció; Autók; Játékok; Ünnepek; Minimalista; Filmek és TV; Természet; Szezonális; Tér; Sport; Technológia; Egyéb
ru: Тема обоев: Абстрактный; Животные; Архитектура; Искусство и иллюстрации; Автомобили; Игры; Праздники; Минималистичный; Фильмы и ТВ; Природа; Сезоны; Космос; Спорт; Технологии; Другое
de: Hintergrundbildthema: Abstrakt; Tiere; Architektur; Kunst & Illustration; Autos; Spiele; Feiertage; Minimalistisch; Filme und Fernsehen; Natur; Saisonal; Weltraum; Sportarten; Technologie; Sonstiges
es: Tema de fondo de pantalla: Abstracto; Animales; Arquitectura; Arte e ilustración; Automóviles; Juegos; Vacaciones; Minimalista; Películas y televisión; Naturaleza; Estacional; Espacio; Deportes; Tecnología; Otros
tr: Duvar Kağıdı Teması: Soyut; Hayvanlar; Mimari; Sanat ve illüstrasyon; Arabalar; Oyunlar; Bayramlar; Minimal; Film ve TV; Doğa; Dört mevsim; Uzay; Spor dalları; Teknoloji; Diğer
lt-LT: Darbalaukio fono tema: Abstraktus; Gyvūnai; Architektūra; Menas ir iliustracija; Automobiliai; Žaidimai; Šventės; Minimalistinis; Filmai ir serialai; Gamta; Sezoniniai; Erdvė; Sportas; Technologijos; Kita